New Jersey, session 221, S2033.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     The principal of a public school shall permit a representative of a patriotic society that is intended to serve young people under the age of 21 to speak to students during regular school hours in the first quarter of the school year.  The patriotic society shall provide the school principal with verbal or written notice of the societys intent to speak to the students to inform the students about the civic involvement of the society, and to explain how students may participate in or join the patriotic society.  The patriotic society shall not solicit personal information from students during the visit.  A school principal shall have discretion over the time, place, and manner of the representatives visit. b.    As used in this section, patriotic society means an organization listed in Title 36 of the United States Code. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.